Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1395XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1395XD (3) 91
th/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 321P.2, subsection 2, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
A local authority may apply for a permit by submitting an
application to the department in a manner determined by the
department. The department may, in its discretion, approve
or disapprove the application for and issue a permit based on
the department’s determination that a system is appropriate
and necessary and the least restrictive means to address the
critical traffic safety issues at a location. If, in the
judgment of the department, a system is inappropriate or
unnecessary or not the least restrictive means to address the
critical traffic safety issues at a location, the department
shall deny the application for a permit. If the department
denies an application, the department shall provide the local
authority the reason for denial. The department shall only
issue one permit for a local authority, which shall set forth
all locations at which a local authority is authorized to use
a system. A local authority may submit an application to the
department to update the local authority’s permit with a new
location in the same manner and with the same information as
required for the initial permit. An application for a permit
must contain all of the following for a location at which the
local authority intends to operate a system:
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 321P.2A Permit suspension and
revocation.
1. The department may suspend a permit issued to a local
authority if the department determines the local authority
violated this chapter or a rule adopted pursuant to this
chapter. If the department suspends a permit, the permit shall
remain suspended until the local authority demonstrates to the
department that the local authority is complying with this
chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.
2. The department may revoke a permit issued to a local
authority or remove an authorized location from a permit if
the department determines the continued use of a system is no
LSB 1395XD (3) 91
-1- th/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
longer appropriate, necessary, and the least restrictive means
to address the critical traffic safety issues at the location.
The department may also revoke a permit issued to a local
authority if the department determines the local authority is
in continuous noncompliance with this chapter or a rule adopted
pursuant to this chapter. A local authority whose permit is
revoked may reapply for a permit in accordance with section
321P.2.
Sec. 3. NEW SECTION. 321P.10 Rulemaking authority —— final
agency action.
1. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
implementing, administering, and interpreting this chapter.
The department shall give due regard for critical traffic
safety issues and shall ensure the rules are consistent with
any federal requirements.
2. For purposes of chapter 17A, the decision of the
presiding officer in a contested case on matters under this
chapter shall be the final agency action for purposes of
judicial review.